Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CONDEMNATION OF CERTAIN LAND IN CASS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the ..... fund to the commissioner of natural resources to initiate condemnation proceedings of the lands described in paragraph (d). The commissioner may use this appropriation for project costs, including but not limited to valuation expenses, legal fees, closing costs, and transactional staff costs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until spent. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 92.45, 94.09 to 94.16, or any other provision of law to the contrary, once the land is condemned under paragraph (a), the commissioner of natural resources may convey the surplus land bordering public waters that is described in paragraph (d) to a federally recognized Indian Tribe for no consideration. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may make necessary changes to the legal description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (d) The land that may be conveyed is located in Cass County and is described as: the Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter; and all that part of the Northwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter lying North of the northerly right of way of U.S. Highway No. 2, as it existed in 2024, all in Section 27, Township 145 North, Range 28 West of the Fifth Principal Meridian, Cass County, Minnesota. new text end new text begin (e) The Department of Natural Resources has determined that the land is not needed for natural resource purposes and that the state's land management interests would best be served if the land was returned to Tribal ownership. new text end